Oklahoma, session 2025, SB860.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-204, as
last amended by Section 3, Chapter 308, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2-204), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-204. The controlled substances listed in this section
are included in Schedule I and include any material, compound,
mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following
hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

A. Any of the following opiates including their isomers,
esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers,
unless specifically excepted, when the existence of these isomers,
esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical
designation:
1. Acetylmethadol;
2. Allylprodine;
3. Alphacetylmethadol;
4. Alphameprodine;
5. Alphamethadol;
6. Benzethidine;
7. Betacetylmethadol;
8. Betameprodine;
9. Betamethadol;
10. Betaprodine;
11. Clonitazene;
12. Dextromoramide;
13. Dextrorphan (except its methyl ether);
14. Diampromide;
15. Diethylthiambutene;
16. Dimenoxadol;
17. Dimepheptanol;
18. Dimethylthiambutene;
19. Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

20. Dipipanone;
21. Ethylmethylthiambutene;
22. Etonitazene;
23. Etoxeridine;
24. Furethidine;
25. Hydroxypethidine;
26. Isotonitazene;
27. Ketobemidone;
28. Levomoramide;
29. Levophenacylmorphan;
30. Metonitazene;
31. Morpheridine;
32. N-desethyl isotonitazene;
33. N-pyrrolidino protonitazene;
34. Noracymethadol;
35. Norlevorphanol;
36. Normethadone;
37. Norpipanone;
38. Phenadoxone;
39. Phenampromide;
40. Phenomorphan;
41. Phenoperidine;
42. Piritramide;
43. Proheptazine;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

44. Properidine;
45. Protonitazene;
46. Racemoramide; or
47. Trimeperidine.
B. Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, when
the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation:
1. Acetorphine;
2. Acetyldihydrocodeine;
3. Benzylmorphine;
4. Codeine methylbromide;
5. Codeine-N-Oxide;
6. Cyprenorphine;
7. Desomorphine;
8. Dihydromorphine;
9. Etorphine;
10. Heroin;
11. Hydromorphinol;
12. Methyldesorphine;
13. Methylhydromorphine;
14. Morphine methylbromide;
15. Morphine methylsulfonate;
16. Morphine-N-Oxide;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

17. Myrophine;
18. Nicocodeine;
19. Nicomorphine;
20. Normorphine;
21. Phoclodine;
22. Thebacon;
23. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-acetamide
(Acetyl fentanyl);
24. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butenamide
(Crotonyl fentanyl);
25. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-
furancarboxamide (Furanyl fentanyl);
26. N-phenyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinamine (4-ANPP);
27. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide (Cyclopropyl fentanyl); or
28. N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butanamide
(Butyrl fentanyl).
C. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances,
their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically
excepted, when the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
1. Methcathinone;
2. 3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. 3, 4-methylenedioxy methamphetamine;
4. 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
5. 3, 4, 5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
6. Bufotenine;
7. Diethyltryptamine;
8. Dimethyltryptamine;
9. 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
10. Ibogaine;
11. Lysergic acid diethylamide;
12. Marijuana;
13. Mescaline;
14. N-benzylpiperazine;
15. N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
16. N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
17. Psilocybin;
18. Psilocyn;
19. 2, 5 dimethoxyamphetamine;
20. 4 Bromo-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
21. 4 methoxyamphetamine;
22. Cyclohexamine;
23. Salvia Divinorum;
24. Salvinorin A;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

25. Thiophene Analog of Phencyclidine. Also known as: 1-(1-(2-
thienyl) cyclohexyl) piperidine; 2-Thienyl Analog of Phencyclidine;
TPCP, TCP;
26. Phencyclidine (PCP);
27. Pyrrolidine Analog for Phencyclidine. Also known as 1-(1-
Phenylcyclohexyl) - Pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;
28. 1-(3-trifluoromethylphenyl) piperazine;
29. Flunitrazepam;
30. B-hydroxy-amphetamine;
31. B-ketoamphetamine;
32. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitroamphetamine;
33. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine;
34. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine;
35. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine;
36. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine;
37. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine;
38. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylphenethylamine;
39. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-fluorophenethylamine;
40. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine;
41. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylthio-phenethylamine;
42. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-isopropylthio-phenethylamine;
43. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-propylthio-phenethylamine;
44. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-cyclopropylmethylthio-phenethylamine;
45. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-tert-butylthio-phenethylamine;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

46. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(2-fluoroethylthio)-phenethylamine;
47. 5-methoxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine;
48. N-methyltryptamine;
49. A-ethyltryptamine;
50. A-methyltryptamine;
51. N, N-diethyltryptamine;
52. N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
53. N, N-dipropyltryptamine;
54. 5-methoxy-a-methyltryptamine;
55. 4-hydroxy-N, N-diethyltryptamine;
56. 4-hydroxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
57. 5-methoxy-N, N-diisopropyltryptamine;
58. 4-hydroxy-N-isopropyl-N-methyltryptamine;
59. 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone (Methylone);
60. 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV);
61. 3-Methylmethcathinone (Metaphedrone);
62. 4-Methylmethcathinone (Mephedrone);
63. 4-methoxymethcathinone;
64. 4-Fluoromethcathinone;
65. 3-Fluoromethcathinone;
66. 1-(8-bromobenzo 1,2-b;4,5-b’ difuran-4-yl)-2-aminopropane;
67. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine;
68. 4-Methylethcathinone;
69. Pyrovalerone;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

70. N,N-diallyl-5-methoxytryptamine;
71. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone (Ethylone);
72. B-keto-N-Methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine (Butylone);
73. B-keto-Methylbenzodioxolylpentanamine (Pentylone);
74. Alpha-Pyrrolidinopentiophenone;
75. 4-Fluoroamphetamine;
76. Pentedrone;
77. 4’-Methyl-a-pyrrolidinohexaphenone;
78. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenethylamine;
79. 2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
80. 1,4-Dibenzylpiperazine;
81. N,N-Dimethylamphetamine;
82. 4-Fluoromethamphetamine;
83. 4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine
(25C-NBOMe);
84. 4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine
(25I-NBOMe);
85. 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzy)phenethylamine
(25B-NBOMe);
86. 1-(4-Fluorophenyl)piperazine;
87. Methoxetamine;
88. 3,4-dichloro-N[2-dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-
methylbenzamide;
89. N-ethyl hexadrone;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

90. Isopropyl-U-47700;
91. Para-fluorobutyrl fentanyl;
92. Para-fluorofentanyl (pFF);
93. Fluoro isobutryrl fentanyl;
94. 3-Hydroxy Phencyclidine (PCP);
95. 3-methoxy Phencyclidine (PCP);
96. Flualprazolam; or
97. Flubromazolam.
D. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in a different
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having stimulant
or depressant effect on the central nervous system:
1. Fenethylline;
2. Mecloqualone;
3. N-ethylamphetamine;
4. Methaqualone;
5. Gamma-Hydroxybutyric Acid, also known as GHB, gamma-
hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutanoic acid, sodium
oxybate, and sodium oxybutyrate;
6. Gamma-Butyrolactone (GBL) as packaged, marketed,
manufactured, or promoted for human consumption, with the exception
of legitimate food additive and manufacturing purposes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. Gamma Hydroxyvalerate (GHV) as packaged, marketed, or
manufactured for human consumption, with the exception of legitimate
food additive and manufacturing purposes;
8. Gamma Valerolactone (GVL) as packaged, marketed, or
manufactured for human consumption, with the exception of legitimate
food additive and manufacturing purposes;
9. 1,4 Butanediol (1,4 BD or BDO) as packaged, marketed,
manufactured, or promoted for human consumption with the exception
of legitimate manufacturing purposes; or
10. N-ethylpentylone.
E. 1. The following industrial uses of Gamma-Butyrolactone,
Gamma Hydroxyvalerate, Gamma Valerolactone, or 1,4 Butanediol are
excluded from all schedules of controlled substances under this
title:
a. pesticides,
b. photochemical etching,
c. electrolytes of small batteries or capacitors,
d. viscosity modifiers in polyurethane,
e. surface etching of metal coated plastics,
f. organic paint disbursements for water soluble inks,
g. pH regulators in the dyeing of wool and polyamide
fibers,
h. foundry chemistry as a catalyst during curing,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

i. curing agents in many coating systems based on
urethanes and amides,
j. additives and flavoring agents in food, confectionary,
and beverage products,
k. synthetic fiber and clothing production,
l. tetrahydrofuran production,
m. gamma butyrolactone production,
n. polybutylene terephthalate resin production,
o. polyester raw materials for polyurethane elastomers
and foams,
p. coating resin raw material, and
q. as an intermediate in the manufacture of other
chemicals and pharmaceuticals.
2. At the request of any person, the Director of the Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control may exempt any
other product containing Gamma-Butyrolactone, Gamma Hydroxyvalerate,
Gamma Valerolactone, or 1,4 Butanediol from being included as a
Schedule I controlled substance if such product is labeled,
marketed, manufactured, and distributed for legitimate industrial
use in a manner that reduces or eliminates the likelihood of abuse.
3. In making a determination regarding an industrial product,
the Director, after notice and hearing, shall consider the
following:
a. the history and current pattern of abuse,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. the name and labeling of the product,
c. the intended manner of distribution, advertising, and
promotion of the product, and
d. other factors as may be relevant to and consistent
with the public health and safety.
4. The hearing shall be held in accordance with the procedures
of the Administrative Procedures Act.
F. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation, whether
produced directly or indirectly from a substance of vegetable origin
or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination
of extraction and chemical synthesis, that contains any quantity of
the following substances, or that contains any of their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of these salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation:
1. JWH-004;
2. JWH-007;
3. JWH-009;
4. JWH-015;
5. JWH-016;
6. JWH-018;
7. JWH-019;
8. JWH-020;
9. JWH-030;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

10. JWH-046;
11. JWH-047;
12. JWH-048;
13. JWH-049;
14. JWH-050;
15. JWH-070;
16. JWH-071;
17. JWH-072;
18. JWH-073;
19. JWH-076;
20. JWH-079;
21. JWH-080;
22. JWH-081;
23. JWH-082;
24. JWH-094;
25. JWH-096;
26. JWH-098;
27. JWH-116;
28. JWH-120;
29. JWH-122;
30. JWH-145;
31. JWH-146;
32. JWH-147;
33. JWH-148;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

34. JWH-149;
35. JWH-150;
36. JWH-156;
37. JWH-167;
38. JWH-175;
39. JWH-180;
40. JWH-181;
41. JWH-182;
42. JWH-184;
43. JWH-185;
44. JWH-189;
45. JWH-192;
46. JWH-193;
47. JWH-194;
48. JWH-195;
49. JWH-196;
50. JWH-197;
51. JWH-198;
52. JWH-199;
53. JWH-200;
54. JWH-201;
55. JWH-202;
56. JWH-203;
57. JWH-204;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

58. JWH-205;
59. JWH-206;
60. JWH-207;
61. JWH-208;
62. JWH-209;
63. JWH-210;
64. JWH-211;
65. JWH-212;
66. JWH-213;
67. JWH-234;
68. JWH-235;
69. JWH-236;
70. JWH-237;
71. JWH-239;
72. JWH-240;
73. JWH-241;
74. JWH-242;
75. JWH-243;
76. JWH-244;
77. JWH-245;
78. JWH-246;
79. JWH-248;
80. JWH-249;
81. JWH-250;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

82. JWH-251;
83. JWH-252;
84. JWH-253;
85. JWH-262;
86. JWH-292;
87. JWH-293;
88. JWH-302;
89. JWH-303;
90. JWH-304;
91. JWH-305;
92. JWH-306;
93. JWH-307;
94. JWH-308;
95. JWH-311;
96. JWH-312;
97. JWH-313;
98. JWH-314;
99. JWH-315;
100. JWH-316;
101. JWH-346;
102. JWH-348;
103. JWH-363;
104. JWH-364;
105. JWH-365;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

106. JWH-367;
107. JWH-368;
108. JWH-369;
109. JWH-370;
110. JWH-371;
111. JWH-373;
112. JWH-386;
113. JWH-387;
114. JWH-392;
115. JWH-394;
116. JWH-395;
117. JWH-397;
118. JWH-398;
119. JWH-399;
120. JWH-400;
121. JWH-412;
122. JWH-413;
123. JWH-414;
124. JWH-415;
125. CP-55, 940;
126. CP-47, 497;
127. HU-210;
128. HU-211;
129. WIN-55, 212-2;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

130. AM-2201;
131. AM-2233;
132. JWH-018 adamantyl-carboxamide;
133. AKB48;
134. JWH-122 N-(4-pentenyl)analog;
135. MAM2201;
136. URB597;
137. URB602;
138. URB754;
139. UR144;
140. XLR11;
141. A-796,260;
142. STS-135;
143. AB-FUBINACA;
144. AB-PINACA;
145. PB-22;
146. AKB48 N-5-Fluorpentyl;
147. AM1248;
148. FUB-PB-22;
149. ADB-FUBINACA;
150. BB-22;
151. 5-Fluoro PB-22; or
152. 5-Fluoro AKB-48.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

G. In addition to those substances listed in subsection F of
this section, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of a synthetic cannabinoid found to be
in any of the following chemical groups:
1. Naphthoylindoles: any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the naphthyl
ring to any extent. Naphthoylindoles include, but are not limited
to:
a. 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-
200),
b. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM2201),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-018),
d. 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-073),
e. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-081),
f. 1-propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-015),
g. 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-019),
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

h. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-122),
i. 1-pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-210),
j. 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-398),
k. 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-007),
l. 1-pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-164),
m. 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole
(JWH-098),
n. 1-pentyl-3-(4-fluoro-1-naphthoyl)indole (JWH-412),
o. 1-[1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole (AM-1220),
p. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole
(MAM-2201), or
q. 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole (AM-2232);
2. Naphthylmethylindoles: any compound containing a 1H-indol-
3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with or without substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the indole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the
naphthyl ring to any extent. Naphthylmethylindoles include, but are
not limited to, (1-pentylindol-3-yl)(1-naphthyl)methane (JWH-175);
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Naphthoylpyrroles: any compound containing a 3-(1-
naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
the pyrrole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on
the naphthyl group to any extent. Naphthoylpyrroles include, but
are not limited to:
a. 1-hexyl-2-phenyl-4-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-147),
b. 1-pentyl-5-(2-methylphenyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole
(JWH-370),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-030), or
d. 1-hexyl-5-phenyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole (JWH-147);
4. Naphthylideneindenes: any compound containing a 1-(1-
naphthylmethylene)indene structure with or without substitution at
the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the indene group to any extent, and whether or not substituted on
the naphthyl group to any extent. Naphthylmethylindenes include,
but are not limited to, (1-[(3-pentyl)-1H-inden-1-
ylidene)methyl]naphthalene (JWH-176);
5. Phenylacetylindoles: any compound containing a 3-
phenylacetylindole structure with or without substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the phenyl
ring to any extent. Phenylacetylindoles include, but are not
limited to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-250),
b. 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole
(RCS-8),
c. 1-pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole (JWH-203),
d. 1-pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-251),
e. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-201), or
f. 1-pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole (JWH-302);
6. Cyclohexylphenols: any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with or without substitution at
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl,
halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, and whether or not further substituted
on the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Cyclohexylphenols include,
but are not limited to:
a. 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-
hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol (CP-47,497),
b. 5-(1,1-dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-
phenol (cannabicyclohexanol; CP-47,497 C8 homologue),
or
c. 5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1R,2R)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-
hydroxypropyl)cyclohexyl]-phenol (CP 55, 940);
7. Benzoylindoles: any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole
structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted on the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted on the phenyl
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

grou p to any extent. Benzoylindoles include, but are not limited
to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole (RCS-4),
b. 1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-2-methyl-3-(4-
methoxybenzoyl)indole (Pravadoline or WIN 48, 098),
c. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-694),
d. 1-pentyl-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-679), or
e. 1-[1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-3-(2-
iodobenzoyl)indole (AM-2233);
8. Cyclopropoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-
(cyclopropoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole
ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted in the
cyclopropoyl ring to any extent. Cyclopropoylindoles include, but
are not limited to:
a. 1-pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole
(UR-144),
b. 1-(5-chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole (5Cl-UR-144), or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole (XLR11);
9. Indole Amides: Any compound containing a 1H-Indole-3-
carboxamide structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3- morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not substituted at the carboxamide
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the indole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quninolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Indole
Amides include, but are not limited to:
a. N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(2NE1),
b. N-(1-adamantyl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (STS-135),
c. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-
indole-3-carboxamide (ADBICA),

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 26
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d. N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-
fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide (5F-ADBICA),
e. N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(NNE1),
f. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(naphthalene-1-yl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxamide (5F-NNE1),
g. N-benzyl-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide (SDB-006),
or
h. N-benzyl-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide
(5F-SDB-006);
10. Indole Esters: Any compound containing a 1H-Indole-3-
carboxylate structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, whether or not substituted at the carboxylate
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the indole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 27
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pyrr ole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Indole
Esters include, but are not limited to:
a. quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (PB-
22),
b. quinolin-8-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (5F-PB-22),
c. quinolin-8-yl 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (BB-22),
d. naphthalen-1-yl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (FDU-PB-22), or
e. naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
carboxylate (NM2201);
11. Adamantanoylindoles: Any compound containing an
adamantanyl-(1H-indol-3-yl)methanone structure with or without
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-
morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-
morpholinyl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl,
phenyl, or halophenyl group, whether or not further substituted in
the indole ring to any extent, and whether or not substituted in the
adamantyl ring to any extent. Adamantanoylindoles include, but are
not limited to:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 28
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. adamantan-1-yl[1-[(1-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-1H-
indol-3-yl]methanone (AM1248), or
b. adamantan-1-yl-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone (AB-
001);
12. Carbazole Ketone: Any compound containing (9H-carbazole-3-
yl) methanone structure with or without substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the carbazole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-
2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, with substitution at the carbon of the methanone
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted at the carbazole, adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl,
pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent. Carbazole
Ketones include, but are not limited to, naphthalen-1-yl(9-pentyl-
9H-carbazol-3-yl)methanone (EG-018);
13. Benzimidazole Ketone: Any compound containing
(benzimidazole-2-yl) methanone structure with or without
substitution at either nitrogen atom of the benzimidazole ring by an
alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 29
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cycl oalkylethyl, benzyl, halobenzyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl,
(tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl, 1-methylazepanyl, phenyl, or
halophenyl group, with substitution at the carbon of the methanone
group by an adamantyl, naphthyl, phenyl, benzyl, quinolinyl,
cycloalkyl, 1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-
1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl, 1-methoxy-3,3-
dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl or pyrrole group, and whether or not
further substituted in the benzimidazole, adamantyl, naphthyl,
phenyl, pyrrole, quinolinyl, or cycloalkyl rings to any extent.
Benzimidazole Ketones include, but are not limited to:
a. naphthalen-1-yl(1-pentyl-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-
l)methanone (JWH-018 benzimidazole analog), or
b. (1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-
yl)(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone (FUBIMINA); and
14. Modified by Replacement: any compound defined in this
subsection that is modified by replacement of a carbon with nitrogen
in the indole, naphthyl, indene, benzimidazole, or carbazole ring.
H. Any material, compound, mixture, extract, or preparation
that contains a prohibited kratom product as provided in paragraphs
3 and 4 of subsection A of Section 1-1432.4 of this title.
I. Any prescription drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration under the provisions of Section 505 of the Federal
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 30
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Food , Drug, and Cosmetic Act, Title 21 of the United States Code,
Section 355, that is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a
controlled substance under federal law by the United States Drug
Enforcement Administration shall be excluded from Schedule I and
shall be prescribed, distributed, dispensed, or used in accordance
with federal law upon the issuance of a notice, final rule, or
interim final rule by the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration designating, rescheduling, or deleting as a
controlled substance such a drug product under federal law, unless
and until the State Board of Pharmacy takes action pursuant to
Section 2-201 of this title. If the Board of Pharmacy does not take
action pursuant to Section 2-201 of this title, the drug product
shall be deemed to be designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a
controlled substance in accordance with federal law and in
compliance with the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB860 SFLR Page 31
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)